Maryland, session 2026, HB1035.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–208.
(a) In addition to the modification under § 10–207 of this subtitle, the amounts
under this section are subtracted from the federal adjusted gross income of a resident to
determine Maryland adjusted gross income.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1035*

HOUSE BILL 1035
(DD) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “QUALIFIED OVERTIME COMPENSATION”
HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 225 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(2) THE SUBTRACTION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
INCLUDES THE AMOUNT OF QUALIFIED OVERTIME COMPENSATION ALLOWED AS A
DEDUCTION UNDER § 225 OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025, but
before January 1, 2029. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of
June 30, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.